Rhode Island, session 2025, SB645.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-18.18-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-18.18 entitled
"Consumer PFAS Ban Act of 2024." is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-18.18-4. Prohibition on use of PFAS.
(a) Except as provided otherwise in this section, on and after January 1, 2027, no person
shall manufacture, sell, offer for sale, or distribute for sale in the state any covered product that
contains intentionally added perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances or PFAS.
(b) Except as provided otherwise in this section, on and after January 1, 2029, no person
shall manufacture, sell, offer for sale, or distribute for sale in the state:
(1) Artificial turf containing intentionally added PFAS; or
(2) Outdoor apparel for severe wet conditions containing intentionally added PFAS, unless
it is accompanied by a legible, easily discernable disclosure that includes the following statement:
“Made with PFAS chemicals.”
(c) If the department has reason to believe that a covered product contains intentionally
added PFAS and the covered product is being offered for sale in the state, the director may direct
the manufacturer of the product to, within thirty (30) days:
(1) Provide the director a certificate attesting that the covered product does not contain
intentionally added PFAS; or
(2) Notify persons who sell, offer for sale, or distribute for sale a covered product
prohibited under subsection (a) of this section, that the sale of that covered product is prohibited in

this state and provide the director with a list of the names and addresses of those notified.
(d) The director may notify persons who sell or offer for sale a product prohibited under
subsection (a) of this section, that the sale of that product is prohibited in this state.
(e) This section shall not apply to the sale or resale of used products.
(f) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, if a cosmetic product made through
manufacturing processes intended to comply with this section contains an unavoidable trace
quantity of PFAS that is attributable to impurities of natural or synthetic ingredients, the
manufacturing process, storage or migration from packaging, or other such unintentional and
unavoidable origin, such unavoidable trace quantity shall not cause the cosmetic product to be in
violation of this section.
(g) Products containing perfluoroalkyl and polyfluoroalkyl substances or PFAS used as
durable items that the United Stated Food and Drug Administration authorizes for food contact for
consumer goods shall be exempt from this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002131
========
LC002131 - Page 2 of 3